Hawaii statutes.
[§46-20.1] County ownership of sewer
transmission lines and facilities servicing Hawaiian home lands. (a) All
sewer transmission lines and other sewerage facilities servicing Hawaiian home
lands existing on [July 7, 2014,] that were developed, constructed, operated,
improved, or maintained by a county, or for which a county otherwise has an
obligation to operate, improve, repair, maintain, or replace, are confirmed to
be owned by the county in which the sewer lines and facilities are located,
including those lines and facilities located on Hawaiian home lands.

(b) Upon demand by the department of Hawaiian
home lands, each county shall accept the license or dedication and ownership of
any and all sewer transmission lines and other sewerage facilities servicing
Hawaiian home lands and that are not subject to subsection (a), as may be
identified by the department of Hawaiian home lands; provided that:

(1) Any sewer lines or other sewerage facilities:

(A) Not subject to subsection (a);

(B) Existing before [July 7, 2014]; and

(C) That the appropriate county determines
are not in substantial compliance with environmental laws, rules, and
regulations pertaining to the dedication or license of the sewers to the
counties at the time of their construction,

shall be brought into compliance with those laws,
rules, and regulations by the department of Hawaiian home lands prior to
acceptance by the county; and

(2) Sewer transmission lines and other sewerage
facilities completed after [July 7, 2014,] shall comply with all applicable
federal, state, and county environmental, design, and construction requirements
prior to acceptance by a county.

(c) Each county shall operate, improve,
repair, maintain, and replace, as necessary, the sewer transmission lines and
other sewerage facilities that are subject to subsection (a) or (b).

(d) No county shall abandon or terminate the
service of sewer transmission lines and other sewerage facilities subject to
this section without the approval of the department of Hawaiian home lands;
provided that the department shall not unreasonably withhold approval if
abandonment or termination is necessary. If sewer transmission lines or other
sewerage facilities are abandoned or terminated, the appropriate county shall
make alternate sewer transmission lines and other facilities available to
service the affected Hawaiian home lands. [L 2014, c 227, §2]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next